Alaska, session 34, SB157.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 05 * Section 1. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section 06 to read: 07 SHORT TITLE. This Act may be known as the Student Fee Transparency Act. 08 * Sec. 2. AS 14.40.170 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 09 (c) At least 30 days before the Board of Regents imposes a new fee or 10 increases an existing fee under (b)(3) of this section, the board shall provide, by 11 electronic mail, to all currently enrolled students a notice that specifies 12 (1) the amount of the new fee or fee increase; 13 (2) the reason for the new fee or fee increase and the purpose for which 14 the university will use the revenue generated by the new fee or fee increase; and 01 (3) whether the new fee or fee increase is permanent or temporary and, 02 if temporary, the date on which the new fee or fee increase is expected to be 03 discontinued. 04 * Sec. 3. AS 14.40 is amended by adding a new section to read: 05 Sec. 14.40.252. Itemized billing statement. The University of Alaska shall 06 provide to each student enrolled in the university a billing statement that itemizes the 07 tuition and fees charged to the student. 08 * Sec. 4. This Act takes effect July 1, 2027. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.